Wisconsin, session 2025, SB302.
do enact as follows:SB302,11Section 1. 301.096 of the statutes is created to read:SB302,2,32301.096 Improving community supervision outcomes; employment. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:SB302,2,54(a) “Baseline employment rate” means the average of the employment rates 5for the fiscal years 2021-22, 2022-23, and 2023-24.SB302,2,86(b) “Documentation of wage-earning hours” means employment records, pay 7stubs, employment letters, contracts, or similarly reliable methods of employment 8verification, as determined by the department.SB302,3,29(c) “Eligible employment” means an occupation or combination of occupations 1for which an individual can provide documentation of wage-earning hours in the 2amount of at least 130 hours in a 30-day period.SB302,3,53(d) “Employment rate” means the proportion of individuals who held eligible 4employment for at least 9 months if at least part of the 9 months was in a given 5fiscal year.SB302,3,86(e) “Evidence-based practices” means supervision policies, procedures, 7programs, and technology demonstrated by scientific research to reduce recidivism 8among individuals on probation, parole, or extended supervision.SB302,3,129(f) “Marginal cost of incarceration” means the sum of all short-term variable 10costs associated with incarcerating an individual in a state facility. “Marginal cost 11of incarceration” includes only correctional costs that marginally change in 12proportion to the inmate population of a facility.SB302,3,1313(g) “Region” means each jurisdiction that is covered by a regional office.SB302,3,1614(h) “Regional office” means an adult probation and parole office that 15supervises individuals who reside under the office’s jurisdiction who are on 16probation, parole, or extended supervision.SB302,3,1917(2) Grants. The department shall award grants to regional offices for 18improving community supervision outcomes. The amount that each regional office 19receives is based on the calculations under sub. (7).SB302,3,2220(3) Allocation of grant moneys received. A regional office shall use the 21funds awarded under this section to provide bonuses for employees of the regional 22office.SB302,4,323(4) Oversight and reporting. (a) The department shall provide oversight 1of the grant moneys awarded to ensure that the disbursed funds are being used in 2accordance with the grant program under this section. The department shall 3maintain an accounting of all moneys awarded under this section.SB302,4,94(b) Beginning no later than the first day of the 19th month beginning after the 5effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and on each July 1 6thereafter, the department shall work with regional offices to prepare and submit 7to the joint committee on finance a comprehensive, publicly available report on the 8implementation of the grant program under this section. The report shall include 9at the minimum all the following information:SB302,4,11101. The effectiveness of the grant payments based on the reports of outcome-11based measures under sub. (5).SB302,4,14122. Any recommendations regarding resource allocations or additional 13collaboration with other state, regional, or local entities or other regions for 14improvements to the grant program under this section.SB302,4,1715(5) Outcome-based measures. The department shall develop, track, and, in 16a publicly available report, publish the outcome-based measures for each fiscal 17year, including all of the following:SB302,4,1918(a) The employment rate and average length of employment for individuals on 19probation, parole, or extended supervision in each region and statewide.SB302,4,2320(b) The percentage of individuals on probation, parole, or extended 21supervision who are convicted of a new crime while on that supervised status for 22each region and statewide and whether the individuals who are convicted are 23employed or not.SB302,5,41(c) The number and percentage of individuals on probation, parole, or 2extended supervision who successfully complete their period of supervised status 3for each region and statewide and whether the individuals who complete their 4period are employed or not.SB302,5,75(d) The number and types of programs for individuals on probation, parole, or 6extended supervision that were created, modified, replaced, or eliminated in each 7region.SB302,5,118(e) An estimate of any savings to the state as a result of reduced correctional 9costs due to lower crime rates among individuals on probation, parole, or extended 10supervision, using the marginal cost of incarceration and the number of individuals 11convicted of a new crime while on supervised status.SB302,5,1412(6) Data collection requirements. (a) The department shall calculate for 13each region and statewide the baseline employment rates for individuals on 14probation, for individuals on parole, and for individuals on extended supervision.SB302,5,1715(b) On July 1 of each fiscal year, the department shall calculate for each region 16and statewide the employment rates for the preceding fiscal year for individuals on 17probation, for individuals on parole, and for individuals on extended supervision.SB302,5,2218(7) Distributing incentive grants for performance. The department 19shall calculate the amount that each regional office is eligible to receive in the 20current fiscal year as a grant under this section for increasing probation, parole, 21and extended supervision employment rates for its region in the immediate past 22fiscal year as follows:SB302,6,223(a) Add the employment rates for individuals on probation, individuals on 1parole, and individuals on extended supervision for the region as determined under 2sub. (6) (b).SB302,6,53(b) Subtract from the sum under par. (a) the sum of the baseline employment 4rates for the region for individuals on probation, individuals on parole, and 5individuals on extended supervision determined under sub. (6) (a).SB302,6,106(c) 1. If the difference determined under par. (b) is positive, multiply the 7difference by the total number of individuals on probation, parole, and extended 8supervision in the region. Multiply that product by $2,500 to determine the amount 9that the regional office is eligible to receive under this section in the current fiscal 10year.SB302,6,12112. If the difference determined under par. (b) is negative, the regional office is 12not eligible for a grant under this section in the current fiscal year.SB302,6,1513(d) If the moneys available for grants under this section in a fiscal year are 14insufficient to pay all amounts determined under par. (c) 1., the department shall 15establish a system to prorate the grants.SB302,6,2016(e) If the department determines that the data required under sub. (6) are not 17of sufficient quality or are not the correct type, the department shall use the best 18available data to estimate probation, parole, and extended supervision employment 19rates using a method that is as consistent with that described in sub. (6) as is 20reasonably possible.SB302,7,221(f) Notwithstanding par. (c) 1., no regional office may be awarded a grant 1under this section if, in the previous fiscal year, its region had an increase in 2revocations based on the commission of new crimes.SB302,7,33